Vermont statutes. Title 27 Property
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 101.
Definition; exemption from attachment and execution.

The homestead of a natural person consisting of a dwelling house, outbuildings, and the land used in connection therewith, not exceeding $125,000.00 in value, and owned and used or kept by such person as a homestead together with the rents, issues, profits, and products thereof, shall be exempt from attachment and execution except as hereinafter provided.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 287

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1979, No. 67

, § 7;

1995, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 24a, eff. Jan. 1, 1997;

2009, No. 55

, § 8.